Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.030

Effective date for assumption of jurisdiction—Criminal causes.

Upon March 13, 1963 the state of Washington shall assume jurisdiction over offenses as set forth in RCW 37.12.010 committed by or against Indians in the lands prescribed in RCW 37.12.010 to the same extent that this state has jurisdiction over offenses committed elsewhere within this state, and such criminal laws of this state shall have the same force and effect within such lands as they have elsewhere within this state.

[ 1963 c 36 s 2; 1957 c 240 s 3.]